Massachusetts, session 194th, S2534.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
When deciding whether to grant admission to an applicant, a public institution of higher
education shall not consider the applicant’s familial relationship to a person who attends or
attended the institution. A public institution of higher education shall not include in the
documents that it uses to consider an applicant for admission information that discloses the name
of any college or university that any relative of the applicant attended.
SECTION 2. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 30A the following section:-
Section 30B. When deciding whether to grant admission to an applicant, a degree-
granting institution of higher education located in the commonwealth authorized to grant degrees
by the board of higher education shall not consider the applicant’s familial relationship to a
person who attends or attended the institution. Such institution shall not include in the documents
of 3

that it uses to consider an applicant for admission information that discloses the name of any
college or university that any relative of the applicant attended.
SECTION 3. The department of higher education shall review and make
recommendations regarding the use of binding early decision admission policies in the
commonwealth. For the purposes of this section, the term “binding early decision admission
policy” shall mean an admission policy of a college or university that allows a student to apply at
an earlier stage of the admissions process, receive an expedited admissions decision, and absent
extenuating circumstances, requires the student to pledge to attend the institution upon receiving
a decision of admittance.
The review shall include, but not be limited to, (i) the number of institutions that maintain
a binding early decision admission policy; (ii) the number of students who apply and are
accepted under that policy; and (iii) the impact of the policy on equity and diversity among
enrolled students including, but not limited to, representation among enrolled students of (A)
students of various economic statuses, including students that receive a maximum federal Pell
Grant, a less than maximum federal Pell Grant and students that receive a federal subsidized
Stafford Loan but not a federal Pell Grant; (B) students of diverse racial and ethnic identities,
including underrepresented and vulnerable groups, disaggregated by major racial and ethnic
subgroup; and (C) immigrant and first-generation students. In preparing the review, the
department shall consult with the attorney general; the department of elementary and secondary
education; the chairs of the joint committee on higher education; the joint committee on racial
equity, civil rights and inclusion; the Advisory Council for the Advancement of Representation
in Education and organizations concerned with equity and education in Massachusetts, including
the Massachusetts Education Equity Partnership; the University of Massachusetts; the
of 3

Massachusetts State Universities Council of Presidents; the Massachusetts Association of
Community Colleges; the Association of Independent Colleges and Universities of
Massachusetts; and any other stakeholders that the department identifies.
The review and recommendations shall include analysis of the overall impact of binding
early decision admissions policies and make recommendations to public and private institutions
of higher education concerning their admissions policies. The review may also include
recommendations to the General Court for legislation.
The review and recommendations shall be published on the website of the department
and submitted to the chairs of the joint committee on higher education and the joint committee
on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion no later than 1 year after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect for admission decisions that lead to an
applicant’s initial enrollment in a higher education institution in the 2026-2027 school year and
thereafter.
of 3